North Dakota, session 69, SB2236.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 47-16-20 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
47-16-20. Rents - When payable - Late fees .
1. When there is no contract or usage to the contrary, the rent of agricultural and wild
land shall beis payable yearly at the end of each year. Rents of lodgings shall beare
payable monthly at the end of each month. Other rents shall beare payable quarterly
at the end of each quarter from the time the lease takes effect. The rent for a lease
shorter than the periods herein specified shall bein this subsection is payable atwhen
the termination of the lease is terminated.
2. If a rental payment by a lessee for a lodging under subsection 1 is not made by the
end of the month, or by a date otherwise specified in the rental agreement, a lessor
may charge a late fee in an amount not to exceed eight percent of the overdue rent
payment.
Page No. 1 25.0576.01000